en: Non-blanched almonds, Almonds (non-blanched), Unblanched almonds
nl: Amandelen (niet geblancheerd)

en: Almond flakes
de: Mandeln (Gehobelt), Gehobelte Mandeln
es: Almendras laminas
fi: Mantelihiutaleet
fr: Amandes effilées
hr: Listići badema
lt: Migdolų drožlės, pjaustyti migdolai, migdolų riekelės
nl: Amandelschaafsel, Amandelvlokken
zh: 杏仁片

fr: Amandes hachées
cz: Mandle jádra
de: Mandeln(gehackt)
pl: Migdały siekane
ro: Migdale mǎrunțite

en: Slivered almonds, lmonds(slivered)
de: Mandeln gestiftet
fr: Amandes allumettes
it: Mandorle a bastonino

en: Ground almonds, Almond meal, Almond powders, Almond flours, Almonds(ground)
de: gemahlene Mandeln, geriebene Mandeln
es: Almendras en polvo, Almendra en polvo, Harinas de almendra, Harina de almendra
fi: mantelijauho, Mantelijauhe
fr: Amandes en poudre, poudres d’amande, poudre d’amande, Amande en poudre
hr: Obrok od badema, Bademovo brašno
it: Pasto di Mandorle, Farina di mandorle
lt: Migdolų miltai
nl: Gemalen amandelen, Amandelpoeders
pt: Farinha de amêndoa

en: Almond peeled unpeeled or blanched
fr: Amande mondée émondée blanchie
zh: 去皮、未去皮或去皮杏仁

en: Roasted almonds, Grilled almonds, Toasted almonds, Almonds (roasted)
ca: Ametles torrades
de: Geröstete Mandeln
es: Almendra tostada, Almendras fritas
fi: grillatut mantelit
fr: Amandes grillées
hr: Bademi na žaru
it: Mandorle Grigliate
lt: Grilinti migdolai
nl: Gegrilde amandelen, Amandelen (gegrild)

en: Unroasted almonds, Almonds (unroasted)
nl: Amandelen (ongegrild)

en: Raw almonds, Almonds (raw)
ca: Ametlles crues
de: Mandeln (Naturbelassen)
es: Almendra natural, Almendra cruda, Almendra cruda con piel
fr: Amandes décortiqués crues, Amandes crues
ro: Migdale crude

en: Salted almonds, Almonds (salted)
de: Gesalzene Mandeln
es: Almendras saladas, Almendra con sal
fi: suolatut mantelit
fr: Amandes salées
hr: Slani bademi
hu: Sós mandula, sózott mandula
it: Mandorle salate
lt: Sūdyti migdolai, Migdolai su druska
nl: Amandelen (gezouten), Gezouten amandelen
pl: Solone migdały
pt: Miolo de Amêndoa com sal
tr: Tuzlu badem

en: Unsalted almonds, Almonds (unsalted)
fr: Amandes non-salées
nl: Ongezouten amandelen, Amandelen (ongezouten)

en: Almonds (roasted and unsalted)
fr: Amandes grillées et non-salées

en: Roasted and salted almonds, Salted and grilled almonds, Grilled and salted almonds, Almond grilled salted, Roasted salted almonds
fr: Amandes grillées et salées, Amande grillée salée
hr: Posoljene i pečene bademe
lt: Grilinti ir sūdyti migdolai
nl: Amandelen(geroosterd en gezouten)

en: Flavoured almonds
nl: Amandelen (gearomatiseerd)

en: Smoked almonds, Almonds(smoked)
da: Mandler med røgsmag
fr: Amandes goût fumé, Amandes saveur fumée
nl: Gerookte amandelen, Amandelen (gerookt)

en: Cashew nuts
bg: Кашу
de: Cashewnüsse, Kaschunüsse
es: Anacardos
fi: cashewpähkinät
fr: Noix de cajou, Anacardes
hr: indijski oraščić
it: Noci di acagiu
ja: カシューナッツ
la: Anacardium occidentale
lt: Anakardžiai
nl: Cashewnoten
pt: Castanha de caju
ru: Орехи Кешью
tr: Kaju

en: Salted cashews, Salted cashew nuts
de: Gesalzene Cashewnüsse, Gesalzene Cashewkerne
fr: Noix de cajou salées
hr: Slani indijski oraščići
lt: Anakardžiai su druska, Sūdyti anakardžiai
tr: Tuzlu Kaju

en: Unsalted cashews, Unsalted cashew nuts
de: Ungesalzene Cashewnüsse, Ungesalzene Cashewkerne
fr: Noix de cajou non-salées
hr: Neslani indijski oraščići
lt: Anakardžiai (nesūdyti)
nl: Cashewnoten (ongezouten), Ongezouten cashewnoten

en: Raw cashew nuts
fr: Noix de cajou crues

en: Roasted cashew nuts
de: Geröstete Cashews, Geröstete Cashewnüsse
fi: paahdetut cashew-pähkinät
fr: Noix de Cajou grillées
hr: Pečeni indijski oraščići
lt: Skrudinti anakardžiai
nl: Geroosterde cashewnoten
tr: Kavrulmuş Kaju